District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.16

Action without a meeting.

(a)

Unless the organic rules require that action be taken only at a members meeting, any action that may be taken by the members may be taken without a meeting if each member entitled to vote on the action consents in a record to the action.

(b)

Consent under subsection (a) of this section may be withdrawn by a member in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives a consent from each member entitled to vote.

(c)

Consent to any action may specify the effective date or time of the action.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1008.04.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 516 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.